Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1213
Vessels; classification.

Vessels subject to the State Boat Act shall be divided into four classes as follows:

Class 1. Less than sixteen feet in length including all canoes regardless of length;

Class 2. Sixteen feet or over and less than twenty-six feet in length;

Class 3. Twenty-six feet or over and less than forty feet in length; and

Class 4. Forty feet or over.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 13;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 110.